Tennessee, session 114, SB1940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
January 22 of each year is observed as "Sanctity of Life Day" so that Tennessee
may renew its commitment each year to protect the sanctity of life, and to honor the lives
of those unborn children lost to legalized abortion.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011835